Wisconsin, session 2025, AB497.
do enact as follows:AB497,15Section 1. 19.32 (1) of the statutes is amended to read:AB497,2,11619.32 (1) “Authority” means any of the following having custody of a record: a 7state or local office, elective official, agency, board, commission, committee, council, 1department or public body corporate and politic created by the constitution or by 2any law, ordinance, rule or order; a governmental or quasi-governmental 3corporation except for the Bradley center sports and entertainment corporation; a 4special purpose district; any court of law; the assembly or senate; a nonprofit 5corporation which receives more than 50 percent of its funds from a county or a 6municipality, as defined in s. 59.001 (3), and which provides services related to 7public health or safety to the county or municipality; a university police department 8under s. 175.42; a charter school, as defined in s. 115.001 (1), regardless of whether 9the charter school is or is determined to be an instrumentality of a school district 10under s. 118.40 (7); a private school participating in a program under s. 115.7915, 11118.60, or 119.23; or a formally constituted subunit of any of the foregoing.AB497,212Section 2. 19.36 (17) of the statutes is created to read:AB497,2,161319.36 (17) Certain pupil records. Records concerning an individual pupil 14maintained by an authority that is a charter school, as defined in s. 115.001 (1), or 15that is a private school participating in a program under s. 115.7915, 118.60, or 16119.23, are not subject to the right of inspection or copying under s. 19.35 (1).AB497,317Section 3. 19.82 (1) of the statutes is amended to read:AB497,3,61819.82 (1) “Governmental body” means a state or local agency, board, 19commission, committee, council, department or public body corporate and politic 20created by constitution, statute, ordinance, rule or order; a governmental or quasi-21governmental corporation except for the Bradley center sports and entertainment 22corporation; a local exposition district under subch. II of ch. 229; a long-term care 23district under s. 46.2895; a charter school, as defined in s. 115.001 (1), regardless of 1whether the charter school is or is determined to be an instrumentality of a school 2district under s. 118.40 (7); a private school participating in a program under s. 3115.7915, 118.60, or 119.23; or a formally constituted subunit of any of the 4foregoing, but excludes any such body or committee or subunit of such body which is 5formed for or meeting for the purpose of collective bargaining under subch. I, IV, or 6V of ch. 111.AB497,47Section 4. 115.7915 (6) (L) of the statutes is created to read:AB497,3,88115.7915 (6) (L) Comply with subchs. II and V of ch. 19.AB497,59Section 5. 118.60 (2) (a) 10. of the statutes is created to read:AB497,3,1010118.60 (2) (a) 10. The private school complies with subchs. II and V of ch. 19.AB497,611Section 6. 119.23 (2) (a) 10. of the statutes is created to read:AB497,3,1212119.23 (2) (a) 10. The private school complies with subchs. II and V of ch. 19.AB497,3,1313